BFN 

<F P=106> [Interview with Marcos Portal, minister of basic industry, </F>
by reporters Hector Rodriguez, Osvaldo Rodriguez, Maribel 
Acosta, and Susana Lee on the "This Very Day" program -- live] 
  [Text] [Hector Rodriguez] Today on our program, we have 
Basic Industry Minister Marcos Portal, who kindly agreed to join 
us on the "This Very Day" program, to whom we say: Good evening. 
  [Portal] Good evening. 
  [Rodriguez] After the first question, which I will be 
asking, 
these other reporters will ask questions: Osvaldo Rodriguez, 
from JUVENTUD REBELDE and who covers the basic industry sector; 
Maribel Acosta, from NTV; and Susana Lee, from GRANMA newspaper. 
  As everyone knows, Minister Portal's presence responds to 
the 
problem of electrical power generation. I would like to ask 
Minister Portal about the current situation with the generation 
of electricity. 
  [Portal] I believe I should start by saying that we are 
going 
to explain the situation with Cuba's electric system objectively 
and clearly. We must point out that this is the greatest, or one 
of the greatest problems that Cuba currently has. In other 
words, it is this situation that we are going to explain. 
  There are solution to our problems, but there are no 
miracles. I wanted to make that clear. The solution not only 
involves the workers and engineers of the electric industry; it 
involves general population. I believe it would be prudent to 
give our explanation to the population based on this fact. We 
appreciate the opportunity to bring this to the people directly. 
  Having said this, we can begin our discussion. I am going to 
use some graphs. The first point we wanted to explain is the 
composition and origin of electric generation in Cuba. I believe 
this is important for two reasons. Our system has 3,132 
megawatts. Of the generation of those 3,132 megawatts, 66 
percent is by equipment from the former Soviet Union and 
Czechoslovakia; 34 percent of that generation is by equipment 
obtained from capitalist countries. 
  There are two things that I would like to point out, the 
first being that 86 percent of all the machinery and plants that 
we have were built after the triumph of the Revolution. 
Approximately 80 percent of today's installed capacity was built 
in the last 25 years or less. 
  [Rodriguez] That is 80 percent. 
  [Portal] Right. In other words, only about 14 percent was 
inherited from the capitalist period. This is very important. I 
believe this gives us a sense of security. The national electric 
system is relatively young, strong, and powerful in its 
generating capacity and in the network of the national electric 
system. We believe that this gives us a sense of sureness of 
overcoming the special period. This is an area where I know 
there have been doubts and concern. The facts give us this 
practical information. 
  The second point I want to make is that 66 percent of the 
electric generation is by equipment obtained from the Soviet 
Union and Czechoslovakia. These two countries have ceased to 
exist. I want to point out that in addition to the material 
guarantees that came from those countries, favorable financial 
conditions, obtaining spare parts and machinery, etc., there is 
a certain technological dependency. It is not a true dependency 
but a technological dependency. The turbines, generators, 
boilers, pumps, etc. were obtained from those countries. This 
was interrupted in the last three years and we have had to face 
this situation boldly, supported, as can be expected, by the 
technical force that we have. 
  From the very beginning of the Revolution our industry has 
been blessed in that sense. We have always had highly qualified 
technicians, engineers, and workers. There are things that 
we....[changes thought] This is the second time that our workers 
have had to take care of our old capitalist plants and solve 
millions of problems. This is the second time we face this 
situation, but under different conditions. This time we are 
facing them with a greater infrastructure. 
  That is the reason I wanted to point this out. We can 
overcome that technological dependency. We can do this in two 
ways: There can be relations with the countries that inherited 
the companies and factories that supplied this equipment, and we 
can obtain materials and resources from other countries to keep 
them in operation. 
  Undoubtedly, three years of interrupted supplies, spare 
parts, and resources is a reality. Speaking from an objective 
point of view, this is what has been happening. This is 66 
percent of the generation, not including the networks. These are 
the two elements that I wanted to point out in this information. 
  I also want to mention another subject we would like to 
discuss, right at the beginning. It has to do with the nation's 
heavy crude oil. This does not mean it is the only crude oil the 
country has, or will have in the future. This is what we have 
today, and its production can be increased. 
  The importance of national crude oil in generating 
electricity cannot be underestimated, especially over the past 
three years: 1992, 1993, and this year, 1994. The nation's crude 
oil had to be used in an immediate or urgent manner as a source 
of generating electricity for the country. The country must be 
aware of this. In 1989, as is well known, we imported 13 million 
tons of oil. This import was reduced almost abruptly. In 1990, 
we imported 10.4 million tons, almost three million tons less. 
In 1991, we imported 8.6 million tons; and in 1992, we imported 
only 6 million tons. This has been thoroughly explained by 
several comrades several times. We must understand the country's 
situation, with that fuel cut in half in two or three years. 
  This is the first reason for using national crude oil in the 
thermoelectric plants. That is, this was not a superficial or 
easy decision. It was a daring and well-considered decision. The 
national crude oil, which has a percentage of brimstone -- 
probably 6 percent or a little more -- because of its viscosity, 
requires a tremendous effort to extract, handle, and transport 
in ships or on Transport Ministry trains, etc., especially for 
its consumption in thermoelectric plants. This implies a 
tremendous effort and decision by the Revolution, a decision 
adopted by us the technicians, the engineers. We made the 
decision to use the national crude oil at a time when we were 
practically hopeless, unable to generate electricity the country 
needed. 
  The country was able to show this last year, namely in July 
and August. The country generated practically 70 percent of its 
overall electricity at that time with the national crude oil. 
That is, two or three thermoelectric plants could face the 
deficit situation and continue generating electricity. This 
year, 30 percent of the electricity is generated with national 
crude oil. We hope to maintain this. It is an important amount 
-- 835,000 tons. We can say that if we were to import the fuel 
oil, it would take approximately $60 million, considering fuel 
oil's current prices. This decision has provided utilities 
amounting to approximately $30 million, or a gross $35 million. 
Today this money does not exist. We do not have it, considering 
the country's financial situation, et cetera. So, we feel that 
this is the main cause. 
  To further explain this phenomenon, we must add that the 
thermoelectric plants are not being destroyed by the national 
crude oil; that is, the turbines -- generators of the 
thermoelectric plants -- fuel-pumping systems, cooling and 
automatic systems, which are important parts amounting to 70 
percent of thermoelectric plants, are not being destroyed by 
this crude oil. 
  The gas pipelines of a thermoelectric plant suffer when the 
petroleum is burned. When combustion takes place, the gas goes 
through the gas piping system and the corrosion level increases. 
We know this is so, but measures are being adopted to solve this 
problem. The shop being built to enamel the surface through 
which the gas passes will be finished this month. This will 
ensure that the metal will have the same lifespan as before, or 
perhaps longer. We will probably use additives to reduce 
corrosion. There is a way of fighting corrosion and of 
assimilating a product. If the country today has this product, 
and if today we use 30 percent, perhaps we could achieve 40, 50, 
or 60 percent within 15 or 20 years, generating our own 
electricity with national fuel. This is very important. We 
cannot make any real projections because we do not know the 
country's capacity, considering the difficulties it has to 
confront, such as the blockade and current harrassment. It is 
important to generate part of our electricity by using our own 
fuel, a national fuel. And this fuel is much better than coal. 
  The national crude oil has twice the burning capacity of a 
ton of coal. That is, a ton of crude oil is equivalent to two 
tons of coal. The same thing happened in the United States and 
in Europe when they experienced a situation similar to ours -- 
for different reasons -- during the early 1970's, when they were 
forced to adapt their thermoelectric plants to consume coal in a 
relatively short period of time -- a year and a half, two years, 
three years -- after the coal supplies had been severed some 20 
years earlier. We did not need to do this. We had a guaranteed 
supply of fuel, although we think this decision was necessary 
and inevitable. 
  Not all our thermoelectric plants are burning national 
crude oil. This should be clearly explained to the people. Of 
our overall capacity, of our 3,123 megawatts, only 40 percent of 
the plants are burning national crude oil. The Rente and the 
Mariel thermoelectric plants are essentially burning crude oil, 
and a total of 1,000 megawatts are produced between the two. 
There is another plant in Santa Cruz del Norte that has one unit 
operating, while a second is being repaired. A third unit is 
sitting right on top of a petroleum deposit. This unit 
represents a tremendous savings for the country. That is, part 
of that petroleum is consumed right there. It is a tremendous 
economic factor. 
  Now, if you add up the numbers, you will say: But how is it 
possible that if national petroleum can be a savings factor for 
the country, no money, resources, or currency have yet been 
obtained to invest in this area? Besides, we are not talking 
about tens of millions of dollars -- which during another time 
might have been a small amount -- but a small amount to offset 
this situation and to keep up the maintenance work. Well, these 
resources simply do not exist. This problem was discussed last 
year at the National Assembly [of the People's Government] 
[ANPP]. It was very well outlined by one deputy who is a 
director of one of our thermoelectric plants, and who discussed 
the financial situation very thoroughly. He correctly reported 
that some $18 million was necessary to try to face the 
maintenance work. I had the responsibility of explaining to this 
comrade that this year, we do not have a cent for that purpose. 
We have difficulties with medicines and with food, and that we 
must try to resist for at least another year before talking 
about thermoelectric plants. Then, by the end of the year, we 
managed to collect some $2 million from the income the country 
is beginning to receive. You know the country is receiving some 
income in dollars from certain activities. Well, this was 
possible and allowed us to repair the thermoelectric plant unit 
in Matanzas, and one unit in Cienfuegos. We are beginning to 
reverse the situation, to increase the available installed 
capacity. We managed to reach 36 percent when the Matanzas plant 
stopped operating by the end of the year, and things have been 
recovering gradually. I will try to explain the solutions we 
found this year; that is, I will explain the measures we are 
adopting and the possible solutions. 
  Well, Hector, I only wanted to make things clear concerning 
the national crude oil. This phenomenon is imposed on national 
life, but we are satisfied, we are happy. That is, we cannot 
just take the negative side of the issue. Of course there are 
people who want to see things negatively. Well, they might do 
so, especially the people abroad who want to see our country 
completely destroyed. But we are not going to allow this. 
  We are producing electricity with a fuel we did not dream of 
some 20 years ago, or even 10 years ago. For five years, we have 
been using it to generate electricity, to generate 30 percent of 
the electricity we are consuming. So how can we Cubans be misled 
by this? This problem is going to be solved. We are going to 
assimilate it as it was assimilated in other countries by using 
coal, which is even more difficult. Imagine using coal as fuel 
for our thermoelectric plants. Imagine the dirt, the handling of 
it, the ashes, the tragedy that coal would cause. Crude oil can 
be assimilated much more easily. We have assimilated it with 
very little investment, namely for the purchase of pumps, etc., 
given the viscosity of the crude oil. When the time comes, these 
plants will require maintenance. Well, this is a subject that 
had to be discussed.... 
  [Rodriguez, interrupting] Yes, this is a subject that is 
discussed continuously. 
  [Portal] I think this talk was necessary, given the 
prevailing confusion and the people's concern over this problem. 
Some people say that we are destroying the thermoelectric 
plants, etc. As I have just explained, some of these plants are 
almost 20 years old, and we are taking good care of them. That 
is, we cannot allow something that is good for the country to be 
damaged. This is the manner in which we are working. But this 
does not include all thermoelectric plants. Part of these plants 
have nothing to do with this. 
  Now I would like to discuss the practical side of the 
national power system [SEN]. I want to refer specifically to 
1989. I think it is important to go back to that year, when we 
managed to obtain 77.7 percent of the available capacity of the 
entire electricity generation system, as well as 23.3 percent, 
which was kept for maintenance, breakdowns, and limitations. We 
must explain that electricity is generated all 365 days of the 
year, and around the clock. It is obvious that part of that 
capacity will be under repair or maintenance, and this requires 
discipline. The SEN has been conceived this way. There is an 
established discipline concerning the thermoelectric plants for 
shutdowns and maintenance. A shutdown can be short or long, 
depending on the needs. There are some units manufactured in the 
1960's, namely those manufactured by the Soviet Union and 
Czechoslovakia. These plants will require 90 or 120 days to be 
repaired. The ones we have in Cienfuegos, which were made by the 
Japanese Hitachi Company require 60 or 70 days, depending on the 
work that must be done. The unit in Matanzas, for instance, 
required only 27 days. Well, some time was saved there. In 
short, part of the plants will need time for maintenance. 
  This is what we mean by 77.7 percent of available capacity, 
and 23.3 of maintenance. This percentage was comparable to the 
most developed countries in the world in 1989. For instance, the 
Yankees have 80 percent, while we have 77.7 percent of the 
available capacity. And this has been consolidated. We have 
achieved this thanks to our workers and technicians. They have 
consolidated this percentage. 
  The breakdown percentage at this moment has reached 50 
percent. That is, breakdowns, maintenance, failures, and 
limitations amount to a total of 50 percent. The idea of 
limitation of a thermoelectric plant has to do with the ashes, 
the dregs, the dirtiness, et cetera, which reduce the potential 
capacity. That is, from 100 megawatts it drops to 95 megawatts. 
We keep it that way, because to clean a plant, it must be 
paralyzed. Moreover, a small breakdown or a leak still allows 
operation for some days, but its generating capacity necessarily 
drops. This is called limitation. 
  We must also refer to the breakdowns in the system, such as 
the breakdown of a boiler pipeline, a steam pipe, et cetera. 
This will demand a shutdown because to repair this damage, the 
plant must be cooled down. Now, why has this generation capacity 
been aggravated? This is the key issue. There are four essential 
causes: 
  The first cause is the suspension of the supply of spare 
parts by those two countries I mentioned before. This supply 
stopped three years ago. This is an important cause. And it is 
the truth. We have managed to survive with our reserves. We did 
have some extra spare parts in our stores, in the steel 
industry, and in other investments. That is, this is a problem, 
and without any drop in generation, we kept these plants 
operating until the middle of last year. That is, we managed to 
resist in 1990, 1991, 1992, and half of last year. And besides, 
in addition to these problems we were also short of fuel. But 
this year we have this fuel, and so the difficulties are being 
overcome. 
  Despite the blackouts, our people have achieved a discipline 
that is unique. It is unique because the people have fulfilled 
the family home plan. At least 90 percent of Cuban families 
managed to save electricity. A large percentage has fulfilled 
the plan, while a small percentage, perhaps 8 or 9 percent, 
failed to fulfill this plan, not saving energy. More than 90 
percent did fulfill it. This is unprecedented. Not even the 
Yankees achieved this when they ran out of fuel. During the 
Carter administration, when they ran out of fuel, a set of 
measures were adopted, such as teaching the women to boil water, 
et cetera. That is, they adopted very serious and drastic 
measures at that time. But with the electricity problem here, we 
have surpassed them with the set of measures we adopted. We are 
sorry that such measures had to be adopted, but to return to our 
point, this phenomenen was the first cause. And we have overcome 
this. And people ask: well, why has this solution been found 
only now? No, this is not a recent solution. The use of the 
national oil was not adopted overnight, and the manner in which 
the country had to face the shortage of spare parts and 
materials did not emerge overnight either. Nothing has been 
improvised. Everything has been done calmly, with intelligence 
and serenity. We had to postpone the maintenance of some plants 
in order to meet some demands. This is the second cause. 
  That is, the maintenance timetable was the second cause. A 
thermoelectric plant, such as that of Matanzas, needed to be 
repaired. And this plant had to keep operating for a year or six 
months without maintenance, while the spare parts were prepared. 
The parts were taken to the shops to be repaired. This demands 
discipline, and this discipline is broken when there are no 
spare parts or the necessary material. 
  The third cause, which to my opinion is the most important, 
has to do with the country's difficult financial situation. We 
are aware of the sugar industry situation, that is, the sugar 
deficit. We are aware of the nickel industry which is also 
experiencing a drop in prices, and a drop in the production 
capacity of our nickel industry. It has abruptly lost its 
market. The socialist countries used to buy 70 percent of our 
nickel, but in 1992 these countries did not purchase any nickel 
at all. They purchased no nickel whatsoever in 1992. 
  [Rodriguez] And was there a need to look for new markets? 
  [Portal] Yes. Today we are selling nickel to 96 countries. 
We 
must not take this as a setback because depending on a single 
country for the sale of our products was beneficial, correct, et 
cetera. But today our comrades from foreign trade have managed 
to reach other markets. Today, our nickel has a market, while 
prices are increasing. 
  Now we need to recover our plants. We are looking for 
financial support to recover these plants. When you lose a 
market and lose your client, you stop having an income. And when 
you stop having an income, if no one grants you a loan -- and 
today no one is granting loans to the country -- the 
international bank does not grant loans, the World Bank does not 
grant loans, no one is granting loans to the country -- this is 
one of the few countries in the world to which no one is 
granting loans. 
  But this does not mean that we are begging for money. We 
have 
a sugar harvest and we have nickel. But I am not going to refer 
to the nickel issue because we have already solved that. What we 
were unable to solve in the two previous years is being solved 
by those who invest in and trust the country, the Revolution, 
and our people. We are already receiving capital for the nickel 
to solve this problem. Guaranteed by what? By the nickel our 
workers are going to produce. That is not the objective of the 
[word indistinct]. 
  The third cause: the lack of hard currency and financing. 
This is solved only by producing, and by intelligently seeking 
sources for financing and markets for our product. That is the 
third cause that I wished to explain. 
  There is a fourth cause, which is the domestic crude. It is 
true that in the boilers, the increase in maintenance by 40 
percent is caused by the use of the heavy crude oil. We should 
not stop... [changes thought] As I explained at the beginning, 
my explanation would be objective and clear, not advisory. These 
are the four causes that have prevented us from keeping this 
23-percent maintenance level. 
  We have not dreamed -- nor does the country need to -- of 
achieving this 23 percent. But today, we cannot provide any 
currency to achieve another 23 percent in two years. This is not 
possible. But having only 50 percent of available capacity has 
created this situation of not being able to meet current 
demands, or an important part of the demand. We must begin 
recovering that capacity that has been lost. We are going to 
explain this further later. 
  In sum, industry has something we call the ABC factor. It 
has 
an "A," a "B," and a "C". The "A" represents the labor force, 
the man, his discipline and productivity. The "B" implies 
ensuring material provisions, its financing; and "C" represents 
the maintenance and repair work. 
  If "B" fails -- that is, the material provision insurance 
and 
the financing, et cetera, -- the repair and maintenance work 
also fails. The men, represented by "A," have faced this. I have 
to say that when a man is working in a thermoelectric plant and 
he sees a problem, a leak, some difficulty, or a need for repair 
-- which he used to do with discipline but now is unable to do 
for lack of resources -- then discipline, productivity, and the 
labor force are affected. The energy industry has failed -- that 
is, the part of it that cannot be disregarded in any industry -- 
has failed. And I am going to further explain the solutions the 
country has found to reverse this situation. 
  But as I was saying, we cannot work miracles. No solution 
will be found in 15 days, one month, two months, or three 
months. No, it cannot be, and I have to explain this clearly to 
prevent any confusion or doubts. This is very important. The 
people will rest assured when they are aware of the decisions 
made. 
  [Rodriguez] Is this a gradual recovery? 
  [Portal] Yes. It is a gradual recovery, a gradual and 
important recovery, and this will be explained in the solutions 
found. 
  Now, to conclude this first topic, because I must speak 
briefly about the issue of consumption in the introduction, I 
wanted to discuss the capacity available for this year -- in 
other words, from the 50 or 45 percent that we have available 
for April. The average for the first quarter was 50 percent. In 
April, we had to take a Japanese unit out of service, which was 
one of the most efficient units in Cienfuegos' system. I believe 
it would be good to explain this: 
  It was one of the better units in our system. A few hours 
before the youth day celebrations began, we were analyzing the 
problems. There had been vibrations in the turbines and problems 
with the boiler. The repairs would require us to shut down the 
unit for seven days. Our comrades recommended that we shut down 
the plant, so we shut it down. Everytime this happens, we are 
going to act accordingly. The population must understand that 
despite the pressure, tension, and numerous difficulties that we 
may have, we will always have to act in that manner because of 
professionalism and discipline. We will not give the order to 
keep a unit in operation so that we later end up with greater 
problems. 
  That unit I was talking about has already been restarted. As 
a matter of fact, in April or May, that plant should have 
already reached its maximum designed capacity. That unit is 
already about 15 years old and we are sure it will run well 
during April and May, until we complete the harvest and other 
activities. If there are problems and we do not shut it down, we 
could have a difficult situation. 
  That is why in April, our capacity dropped to 44 percent. By 
December, we should be at 60 percent. What are we doing and what 
do we have to do to reach 60 percent? We will have to provide 
maintenance and repairs to 1,800 megawatts of those that are 
currently installed. This is a high percentage; almost 60 
percent of all the generating plants, but it can be done. 
  I brought information with me about how the installed 
capacity in each one of the main thermoelectric plants will 
behave. I believe it is useful...it is correct. This lists the 
contribution that each thermoelectric plant must make. It is on 
the graph and can be explained, right? 
  [Rodriguez] Yes, because we are also broadcasting through 
Radio Rebelde. 
  [Portal] Oh, okay. The Mariel generating plant, which is 
currently operating at 39 percent of its capacity, will end the 
year with 58 percent of its capacity. The plant in Santa Cruz, 
which is operating at 40 percent of its capacity, will end the 
year with 80 percent of its capacity, with the two units of 100 
[not further specified] that it currently has in operation. In 
the solutions, we are going to provide more interesting 
information on that generating plant. 
  Havana City -- the link that is generated in Havana City, 
which is composed of Talla Piedra, Regla, and Frank Pais -- is 
where the oldest units are concentrated. They are the units of 
highest specific consumption -- 400 grams per kilowatt. The 
original idea was to keep those units as reserves in the 
national electric system. Today, we propose to restore their 
installed capacity. Forces from the Ministry of Construction, 
government and party leadership in Havana, as well as our 
comrades, believe it possible to restore those plants and bring 
the capital to 53 percent of its available capacity, which is 
almost 136 megawatts, by the end of the year. 
  We are being conservative in giving these figures. They have 
planned to do even more. They have even set the goal of 
recovering another plant called the Frank Pais, which is also in 
the capital and which has two generating units. Here we have two 
blocks, imported from Czechoslovakia. The rest are from the 
capitalist era. 
  The Matanzas generating plant is currently at 100 percent of 
its capacity and will close the year with 100 percent. Here I 
want to pause and say that in September we will close that plant 
to do an overhaul. 
  [Rodriguez] For how many days? 
  [Portal] They figure it will be approximately 27 or 30 days. 
We may be able to do it in less. By that time, in September or 
October, we should have repaired other units, to minimize the 
effect. In Cienfuegos, we currently have 92 percent and should 
end the year with 52 percent. Why? Because, in December, when 
the Matanzas plant is back in operation -- we must take into 
account the sugar harvest and the consumption -- the large unit 
of Cienfuegos will be taken offline until the first few days of 
January. 
  What about Nuevitas? Nuevitas does not burn domestic crude 
oil. They are Czechoslovakian units -- three of 125 megawatts, 
and three of 64 megawatts. As you can see, it is at 32 percent 
of its capacity. It is one of the places most affected. Those 
plants have different problems of a technical and material 
nature. Our goal is to bring Nuevitas to 50 percent by December. 
There is a chance we will be able to do better, but there are 
some factors we must consider. We prefer to be conservative. 
  The Rente power plant in Santiago de Cuba is currently at 33 
percent of its capacity, and they should end December with 60 
percent. The people in Santiago de Cuba are sure they will be 
able to accomplish this, reaching 300 megawatts. As you can see, 
we currently have 1,378 megawatts; and we should reach 1995 with 
1,890 megawatts. That is more than 500 megawatts more by the end 
of the year. With that capacity, we can eliminate the power 
outages during the day, for example, which affect the economy 
and the population. We should have a schedule of power outages 
that is more reasonable for the population. 
  For this purpose, I am going to explain the measures being 
adopted, and the guarantees. That is, this is not an explanation 
without a basis. This explanation has a basis that I will 
explain when I get to explaining the solutions. 
  What I have to explain concerning consumption is brief, but 
perhaps it is the most difficult and most complex aspect. We 
will need the people's participation for this. It is as folows: 
  This year, electricity consumption is increasing. It is a 
modest increase, of close to 6 percent, but an increase that 
began last year when generation began to drop. That is, this 
6-percent increase is not something... [changes thought] There 
is part of the economy being reactivated. 
  Now, Cuban families have consumed 14 percent more 
electricity 
during this quarter as compared to the previous year. 
  [Rodriguez] Is this a 14-percent increase? 
  [Portal] Yes, an increase of 14 percent, despite the 
blackouts and interruptions in the energy supply. This is 
essentially due to the use of electric stoves. This can be 
clearly seen at 1200 [local time], for instance, when generation 
increases by 300 megawatts more than last year. And at 2000 
[local time], generation increases by 350 megawatts. There is a 
percentage of families who are very much linked to the use of 
liquefied gas, processed gas, and kerosene [luz brillante] 
nationwide, but today they are cooking on electric stoves of 
many types, even homemade stoves. This has created a situation 
that aggravates the matter. 
  I was explaining that this is the most complex issue because 
we cannot say that the liquefied gas or the kerosene shortage 
will be solved immediately because we cannot say that we have 
the currency necessary to solve this problem. We cannot yet say 
that we have the necessary resources. The same thing can be said 
about the other fuels. An aggravation of the fuel shortage would 
also aggravate our situation. I must objectively say, and 
clearly explain to the people that this increase in consumption 
cannot be met, not even by improving the thermoelectric plants 
or the electrical network. And today we cannot ask the people to 
give up that way of cooking because there is no other, better 
way. But to the extent that we can manage to restore the supply 
of liquefied gas and of kerosene, this situation must be 
reversed. 
  [Rodriguez] Then we must stop using the electric stoves. 
  [Portal] Yes, we must stop using electric stoves. This is 
nothing new. That is, the country has not really foreseen this 
during this period or during this century. In the first place, 
the country does not have the necessary thermoelectric plants 
for that. That is, out of two million inhabitants, one million 
are using electricity for cooking, and there is no 
thermoelectric plant that can guarantee this. We must return to 
the past. 
  The same thing happens with the electricity network. In a 
block or a zone where you live, some 10, 15, or 20 percent of 
the families might be using electricity for cooking. Well, that 
transformer at that pole will not resist, that cable will not 
resist long enough, nor will the internal electrical 
installations in homes take this increase in consumption. This 
is a very complex problem, and I wanted to explain this 
situation, stemming from the increase in electricity 
consumption. We must try to recover the supply of liquefied gas, 
the gas that is sold on the street [passage indistinct]. 
  In the future, when we can make investments in the sugar 
mills and the situation with the special period is a bit more 
favorable, we will have to think about gas, which also requires 
a specific infrastructure. 
  But regarding electricity, it will be impossible for the 
Cuban population to use electricity to cook over the next 10 to 
15 years without nuclear reactors or anything else. We are going 
to have no alternative but to ask for the population's 
cooperation and discipline. In other words, as we.... [changes 
thought] Furthermore, there are all types of stoves. You can 
figure it out for yourselves. There are stoves with coils that 
consume 1 kilowatt of electricity. Cuba has 2.7 million 
families. Just 100,000 families using these stoves could consume 
100 megawatts. 
  And 200,000 families will consume 200 megawatts; 300,000 
families will consume 300 megawatts. That is what the Matanzas 
thermoelectric plant generates. Then 500,000 families will 
consume 500 megawatts, but there is no way to cope with this. 
Today there is no way to cope with this. You have seen that the 
peak demand... [changes thought] And not seeking to justify the 
explanation or to change the thought, I do not want to refer to 
other increases in energy consumption. But in the television 
schedule, for instance, we know that there are illegal 
installations being made, so if the use of television is 
increased, this will also increase consumption. 
  There are other things increasing the consumption of 
electricity. The most significant of all is the electric stove. 
This should not be. It can affect other activities that are 
vital to the economy. The population itself suffers because 
someone who has this type of stove causes an outage for three or 
four other families. In other words, in just three or four 
hours, the situation becomes complicated and one part of the 
population affects another. That is, the outages get off 
schedule. This is a phenomenon that I wanted to explain. 
  [Rodriguez] Mr. Minister, I believe the Cuban population 
prefers cooking with gas rather than with electricity. I believe 
they will cooperate, especially since they prefer to cook with 
other types of.... 
  [Portal, interrupting] Yes, but 70 percent of the population 
cooks with kerosene [luzbrillante]. At this point, the 
population cannot stop cooking with kerosene. When the 
Revolution triumphed, half the population was cooking with wood 
and coal -- 52 percent of the population. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Fifty-two percent? 
  [Portal] Yes, they used wood and coal. The use of kerosene 
and gas increased, and the living standard improved. 
Nevertheless, this is not the best fuel to use. As you have 
already mentioned, gas is much better. 
  To begin discussing solutions, I wanted to explain that the 
electricity we have.... [changes thought] It has been repeatedly 
explained that electricity is not stored, but instead, is 
generated at the moment. The population can see that as the 
power plants generate electricity, the energy is immediately 
consumed. 
  In the past, we always had back-up power plants generating 
at 
lower capacity. As soon as there were problems, their capacity 
was increased. All it took was anywhere between 1 and 10 
minutes. It was very fast. We do not have this today. When a 
generating unit is taken offline, there is an immediate outage 
or interruption that cannot be announced in advance because it 
is practically instantaneous. The country and the population 
suffer very much because of this, and the situation will not be 
solved immediately because of the problem we have with 
generating capacity. 
  The other thing that is very clear is that our system is set 
up like other systems in other parts of the world: It does not 
take away electricity, but supplies electricity. In other words, 
the electrical networks are to supply. We have made several 
changes and small investments to isolate certain services from 
the normal circuits. These are hospitals; economic activities 
important for the country; the tourism industry, to a certain 
extent; and the sugar mills. 
  But here in Havana City, approximately 30 percent of the 
families practically never have power outages, such as in Habana 
Vieja, where it would be technologically impossible. There are 
other parts of Centro Habana and parts of Vedado, where it would 
also be impossible. There are also circuits associated with a 
pediatric hospital, the Hermanos Almeijeiras, and the Calixto 
Garcia, where it is very difficult to isolate the families. What 
happens is that families not on those circuits suffer longer 
outages. 
  In July and August of 1993, we agreed that during times of 
difficulty, especially here in the capital, and in the rest of 
the provinces they also do this.... [changes thought] I believe 
I should explain that there are several provinces that, despite 
last year's improvement, have had anywhere from 12 to 16 hours 
of outages a day for many days, weeks, months. In other words, 
what happened in the capital for 15 days [as heard] is similar 
to the rest of the country. The rest of the country has been 
facing a very serious situation. 
  Because of the concentration level that exists in the 
capital, where approximately 2 million people live, and because 
of the problems we have been having, we always try to prioritize 
the capital. But at this moment, at the height of the sugar 
harvest, when not producing sugar, or the plan being affected by 
power outages would be a hard blow to our country, we must 
guarantee the energy needed for all exportable activities: the 
sugar harvest, the nickel industry, the tobacco harvest, for 
which electricity is used to dry the leaves. There have even 
been outages in this area. We have had to make an extra effort 
to prevent outages for that industry. We must preserve those 
activities. I believe the population must agree with this 
because we are defending the population and the country when we 
act in this manner. 
  It is true that not everyone has a relative in the 
hospital, but we cannot become uneasy, nervous, or tense and 
take the energy away from a pediatric hospital, or another 
important hospital where there are sick people, or people having 
surgery. 
  I mention this because there have been incidents in various 
places. Some malicious people believe that the electric service 
will be restored through that type of pressure. I can assure you 
of two things: First, we act with professionalism in this and 
are convinced it is the way we must behave. When the power is 
interrupted in a place.... [changes thought] Secondly, we act 
with conviction. We are defending this like the majority of the 
population. That is one thing that cannot be changed. In other 
words, the fact that one acts with conviction in not affecting 
hospitals, water management systems, or cold storage centers 
which cannot be changed. 
  So, they can do what they want, but we.... [changes thought] 
Our people must trust that we will continue to act that way. 
  [Rodriguez] That is fair. 
  [Portal] Do not worry about that. There are comrades who 
have 
been mistaken, but with much dignity and authority, we are going 
to continue acting that way. 
  There are no privileges or anything like that in relation to 
the outages. Banish the idea. If there are things that are 
considered unjust, they must be reported and we will act on 
them. In other words, we do not accept that type of behavior 
from our comrades. I wanted to make that very clear. 
  Well, let us talk about material guarantees and their 
financing. This year, we already have financing for some $3 
million in resources, which are arriving. We are talking about 
steel, special tubing, electrodes [electrodos], and gaskets. 
Part of this is already arriving. Apart from this, there is 
another $7 million which will be progressively allocated 
throughout the year. Between the two, there is $10 million 
destined for the generation of electricity. 
  It is not something reaching 70 or 80 percent, but 
sufficient 
to meet what the country has set as an objective. I already 
explained that $2 million was provided last year, and that this 
year, there is $10 million. This is five times more than last 
year. But we must administer this money. This money is not 
administered by any bureaucratic apparatus, but by the same 
comrades who are conducting the maintenance work and who make 
the decisions on what must be purchased now and what must be 
purchased later. In this manner, the country has thus progressed 
a great deal. That is, we have improved this part of the 
administration. These people who must decide on what to buy are 
people with experience, knowledge, and training. 
  Second measure: the preparation and implementation of the 
maintenance and repair works I already explained. I want to add 
that this will affect practically 60 percent of the installed 
capacity today: that is, 1,800 megawatts. 
  This is very important because it will give more reliability 
to the system. That is, if we are today putting into operation a 
thermoelectric plant that experienced a breakdown in the 
pipeline or some kind of leak, well, when this plant is repaired 
and maintained, this plant gains more reliability, and thus 
there will be fewer blackouts [words indistinct] and for this 
reason I mention this as a second measure. This graph is 
intended to increase the reliability, not only a percentage of 
[passage indistinct] and the maintenance workers. 
  This means that our government officials have adopted an 
exceptional measure concerning the thermoelectric plants and the 
maintenance shops. The workers will also receive special 
incentives, especially those who are directly involved, 
beginning with the top engineer of a thermoelectric plant, that 
man who plays the role of a director. I am referring to the top 
engineer and all those under him. I am referring to that man who 
is there on Saturday and on Sunday; that man who has a family, 
and has the same needs in his home as any other Cuban citizen; 
that man in charge of that shift, the plant operators who work 
Saturdays and Sundays. 
  In our current situation, these comrades are continuously 
submitted to a tremendous workload and pressure. Imagine working 
Saturdays, Sunday nights, early morning. They also have to pick 
up other workers so the plant may be working at top level to 
improve the situation. This is the prevailing situation. 
  We have been talking to other workers, to other colleagues 
from other ministries, and everyone agrees with the measures 
adopted in the electricity area, because we know that the 
harvest is being carried out under very difficult conditions by 
workers in the sugar industry, which is our main industry. We 
are aware of the workers' situation in this area. I am certain 
that those workers are in agreement with measures adopted in the 
thermoelectric plants because they know that workers here are 
also working like them, 365 days a year. 
  I wish to add that those workers would agree with the 
incentives to be given to the workers of the thermoelectric 
plants because they are aware of the difficult conditions under 
which they are working. These incentives, which will be in food, 
et cetera, will be rigorously implemented. 
  We already have the first experience. It has to do with 
discipline. To achieve the incentive that will be established, 
the worker must have zero absence. 
  [Rodriguez] Zero absence? 
  [Portal] Yes, zero absence, and that includes tardiness. No 
tardiness will be allowed. This also goes for sickness, because 
if during the month a comrade gets sick and is taken to the 
hospital or is treated at home, well, it must be justified. But 
that is not enough. I say this because the sick leave rate is 
very high, and it does not justify absenteeism. To achieve the 
incentives, the worker must have zero absence. 
  The Basic Industry Ministry has special infirmaries for 
those 
workers with some kind of problem. That is, we have 
professionalism and morale, and a revolutionary health system. 
We take care of any worker who might get sick. If he needs help 
at home, we go to his house to help him. But that is as far as 
we can go. That is, this system of giving incentives will be 
very strict. 
  [Rodriguez] These incentives are not for all, just for the 
best, for those who fulfill their jobs. 
  [Portal] Yes, for the good workers. Well, I am talking about 
discipline. And the other aspect I would like to mention is the 
fulfillment of what I have just explained; that is, the 
availability factor of thermoelectric plants, the fulfillment of 
the repair and maintenance work. Listen, most of our workers are 
well-disciplined. They are not worried about this. But I have to 
say it because it must be clear to all sectors that this is an 
exceptional decision, and that the country has made this 
decision, together with the workers, and it aims at obtaining a 
result. Otherwise, it will just be a mess. And it will not be 
that way. If the country and the Revolution must trust someone, 
the workers from the electricity area are the first to be 
trusted. 
  This second measure looks more like an incentive because the 
country and society want to recognize the role played by the 
workers. I think this will yield a result. Yesterday, the 
directors of the thermoelectric plants, the union leaders, and 
our comrades have ratified the conditions under which this 
incentive will be granted. We think that within the next few 
days it will be implemented, especially during the first days of 
May. 
  The other matter I wanted to discuss is that related to the 
support given to the thermoelectric plants. The country's 
constructive capacity is strong, and the Ministry of 
Construction is supporting the repair and maintenance work both 
in Santiago de Cuba and in Mariel, as well as in Nuevitas. That 
is, to the extent that the resources arrive, the country will 
have more possibilities for facing this problem. The SIME 
[Steelworking Industry] is doing the same. 
  Concerning the consumption of electricity, both in state 
organizations and in the homes, I just wanted to say the 
following: We have to be very strict concerning production in 
the most effective companies. This is being done by all 
ministries. The electricity received must be used well. All the 
unimportant areas must be eliminated, such as air conditioners. 
These must be eliminated. That is, consumption must be minimal. 
During these difficult months, we must try to use it as little 
as possible. 
  Now, let me refer to the prioritized organizations, the 
hospitals, the hotels, some industries, [changes thought] well, 
there are industries that finance their own fuel and give away 
their dollars; these are not prioritized industries. Several of 
our comrades have traveled abroad. We have visited some 
countries and were able to see what happens in hotels at dawn or 
in the evening -- all lights and systems are extinguished. Well, 
I do not want to [words indistinct]. The organizations are 
already working in making a thorough control or inspection, or 
whatever might be necessary, to prevent the electricity from 
being misused at a given time of day. We must adopt these 
measures now more than ever. This will be indispensable over the 
next few months. 
  A new system is being prepared in the capital, which is more 
complex. It is a disconnection system that will be implemented 
when a thermoelectric plant unexpectedly stops operating. That 
is, there will be a system to regulate the level of electricity 
supply to help us regulate consumption. That is, if 30 percent 
of the overall capacity is to be released, well, that is what we 
are going to do. We are working on this. 
  Finally, I also want to mention something I consider 
important, that there are two thermoelectric plants under 
construction. One in Holguin, specifically in Felton. Both were 
made by Czechoslovakia. But the company that had supplied them 
has fulfilled its commitment. In previous years when we had a 
serious fuel shortage that also affected the nickel plant 
located in the same province, these units helped guarantee the 
supply of energy. And we expect to finish the first unit by the 
end of the year. 
  [Rodriguez] The one in Felton. 
  [Portal] Yes, in Felton. This unit can produce 250 
megawatts. 
In Santiago de Cuba the Rente plant has not been able to 
stabilize the generation of more than 200 megawatts during the 
entire year. You can thus imagine the significance of generating 
250 megawatts by the end of the year in the eastern region, 
starting in Las Tunas. More than 3.6 million Cubans live in this 
area, that is, 35 percent of our population. This means that 
electricity generation in this territory will be improved, and 
this will also improve the supply of electricity in the western 
region because there will be no more need to extend electricity 
supply toward the eastern region. This is to take place by the 
end of the year, and is not something that will take place right 
now. But I wanted to tell you that we are receiving resources 
little by little. The work has not been suspended and the 
workers are prepared to continue. I believe this is objective 
information given by the provincial government, the party, the 
Construction Ministry, and the workers' contingent. This can 
really be achieved, and perhaps 18 or 24 months later we will 
have the second unit. That means 500 megawatts. That is, if the 
overall system generates 3,000 megawatts, 500 megawatts 
represent almost 15 percent, between 12 and 15 percent. 
  There is another 100-megawatt unit, unit number 11 of the 
Soviet- made 100-megawatt plants. In the eastern part of Havana 
there are five 200-megawatt units. There are three 100-megwatt 
and five 200-megawatt units. The five 200-megawatt units are no 
longer operating and will not be repaired. They are part of 
other aspirations, of other levels of development which we will 
not reach. But that 100-megawatt unit is very important. As I 
explained before, it is sitting on an oil deposit. Thus, some 
350 new megawatts will be generated by the end of the year. This 
is almost 12 percent. This is a unit that will also improve the 
country's generation, by almost 12 percent of the overall 
production. And when the other 250-megawatt unit begins 
operating, it will increase by another percentage point. If we 
generate 500 or 600 megawatts in the east, that is almost 20 
percent of the overall system. But this is still under 
construction; this is what we wanted to explain in this 
introduction. 
  [Rodriguez] Very well, minister. Let us now give the floor 
to 
our guests, the reporters. I do not know whether to begin from 
the left or the right. I think Maribel wants to speak. Maribel 
Acosta is from Radio Rebelde. 
  [Acosta] The explanation has been very broad, and we wanted 
to get into details. According to your explanation, the energy 
crisis we are experiencing today is caused by the thermoelectric 
plants and not by the petroleum crisis. You also said that the 
use of Cuban crude oil was relatively safe, that is, that the 
maintenance problem existed with or without the use of the Cuban 
petroleum, so you did not proscribe the use of the Cuban oil. 
You also mentioned a maintenance timetable which will be 
implemented soon, and that this must lead the country to reach a 
generating capacity of 60 percent by the end of the year. My 
question is this: How long or when will the current blackouts be 
reduced? After such a long time, how will this situation, 
specifically the situation of the blackouts, be reversed? 
  [Portal] Maribel, this situation is affecting the entire 
country. The situation in the capital today is what the 
provinces have been experiencing for many months. This has been 
a lengthy period. The situation prevailing over the past 15 days 
because of the breakdown of the Cespedes thermoelectric plant, 
which I already explained, and because of other failures here in 
the capital, I cannot say is exceptional. This situation has 
been affecting the entire country, but here in the capital the 
situation is worse because of the situation of services, 
overpopulation, the tall buildings...[changes thought] that is, 
we are well aware of this situation; even the water supply was 
affected at a given moment. That is, this is a very difficult 
situation. 
  Then, the generation of electricity has not been restricted 
to 15 hours. That is, it has been improving because it was 
dropped to nine and eight hours. But I want to explain this 
because in your question you mentioned the fuel issue, and we 
cannot say that there will be no difficulties with fuel. We will 
have difficult moments throughout the year, and it is possible 
that we may have a fuel shortage. We must be prepared not only 
to include the available capacity but to face any difficulty. 
  For this reason I was explaining the measures that will be 
adopted. I explained in the beginning that this is not possible. 
I explained in the beginning that we are going to seek 
solutions, not miracles. We do not think blackouts will be 
solved in a short period of time. It is not possible, not even 
by generating more electricity or producing more fuel, because 
today we are generating a certain amount of electricity; we 
cannot generate, just overnight, the same amount of electricity 
we used to generate some three years ago. The country does not 
have enough currency to say that the blackouts will end in one, 
two, three, or five months. The timetable of repairs, Maribel, 
is being fulfilled. That is, the Matanzas [plant] was paralyzed 
in September and we are already beginning to recover our 
capacity. I said that when the Matanzas [plant] stopped 
operating, generating capacity was approximately 36 percent; now 
we have between 44 and 45 percent, and it must keep increasing 
to stabilize at 50 percent by July or August. Then it must keep 
increasing to reach 60 percent. Do you understand this? 
  [Acosta] And what would this 60 percent represent as far as 
the blackouts? 
  [Portal] Well, concerning electricity generation, we believe 
that by increasing generation to 60 percent by the end of the 
year, the blackouts during the day will be eliminated. That is 
my belief. The blackouts that take place at night...[changes 
thought] well, there must be other reasons. But I do not want to 
give you the idea that there will be no problem with fuel, that 
everything has been stabilized, etc. No. The problems I have 
mentioned concerning financing...[changes thought] the nickel 
production and not even the sugar industry will be sufficient to 
solve this problem. I want to remind you that we started the 
blackouts in late 1989 and throughout 1990. That is, we had to 
start blackouts because it was impossible to avoid them, even by 
importing 6 million tons of petroleum, and much less with the 
1.2 million tons we will have this year. We hope for a little 
more. 
  [Rodriguez] Of national crude oil? 
  [Portal] Yes, national crude oil. If we did not have the 
national crude, Maribel, I could not have told you this story. 
  [Rodriguez] That is, if we speak in sports terms, we have 
saved the game. It has saved our game. Susana Lee, your turn to 
ask. 
  [Lee] Minister, you have already answered a number of 
questions we and some listeners wanted to ask. Nevertheless, I 
want to ask you something about electricity bills. With so many 
blackouts, the bills have also been increased. This is one 
question, on electricity bills. Moreover, in the workers' 
parliaments which were held recently, many people proposed 
raising the electricity rate as a way to streamline the economy. 
What is the truth about this, or what are your ideas about it? 
  [Portal] On this issue, I am forced to say that Cuba is one 
of the countries where people pay their electricity bills with 
greater discipline. I must say this, now that you ask me this 
question about bills. This shows that our people....[changes 
thought] We have 2.5 million families who must pay for the 
electricity they use. And today the family's debt for 
electricity is less than [words indistinct]. This is only one 
example. The same thing happens with the state. This is the 
largest organization in the country and it has a billing system 
different from other state organizations, but it is a system 
that works. Now that you have asked the question, I want to 
convey my appreciation for that discipline, which has not been 
lost. 
  [Rodriguez] Does everyone pay electricity bills? 
  [Portal] Yes, everyone does. It is true that some bills are 
collected at the house, but bills can also be paid in one of our 
units, at the banks, or at the post office. There are easy ways 
to pay these bills, but the people....[changes thought] Well, in 
some provinces payments have been delayed, but have been 
recovered and the discipline has not been lost. 
  The electricity rate per family has increased 14 percent 
despite the blackouts. It is obvious, Susana, that when the 
blackouts are restored -- and I thank you for asking this 
question because it gives me the opportunity to explain this -- 
when we restore the electricity supply, it surges into the 
system, the refrigerator, the television set, the lights, etc.; 
everything is turned on, and the discipline which has been 
excellent is lost. When one gets used to cooking with 
electricity, it is impossible to consume less electricity, even 
when there are blackouts at the time for cooking, when 
electricity is in heavy demand. For this reason I think there is 
an increase in the electricity bills, and of course the people 
worry about this situation. But part of the energy is recovered 
despite the blackout. Of course, television programs are not 
recovered. But the iron and the refrigerator do recover some of 
the energy. That is, part of the energy is recovered. This has 
been demonstrated, and the electric meters record it and it must 
be paid. That must be the cause of the increase. 
  The other question is also important. Many capitalist 
countries, especially those in which the consumer society 
supposedly tends to increase expenditures, have performed 
calculations and reached the conclusion that they save more or 
obtain more benefits from increasing the utility rates, although 
this might favor savings, than from building new thermoelectric 
plants and increasing the generating capacity. This is true in 
the United States and other countries. Our rates are fixed: nine 
cents, regardless of whether consumption is higher or lower. 
Most countries have already been replacing this system 
gradually: the greater the consumption, the higher....[changes 
thought] This is just the opposite of what prevailed here after 
the Revolution, when the greater the consumption, the lower the 
payment. This has been changing. Now, what is our conclusion? 
  No decision has been made on this; neither can I talk about 
rates. But we have analyzed the following: Forty-two percent of 
the Cuban population consumes up to 100 kwh of electricity. And 
this consumption is approximately 25, or between 25 and 30 
[percent], of the overall energy in the residential sphere. That 
is almost half of the population. 
  [Rodriguez] It is 42 percent. 
  [Portal] Now, whom does that figure represent? That figure 
represents low-income families. We have this well calculated. 
There are the retired people, low-income workers, this or that, 
workers in general, etc. Well, one proposal is that the rate 
should be fixed for that part of the population. The rate that 
is valid today should be maintained. And this rate is up to nine 
pesos monthly. This is one idea. 
  Then, those families that consume between 100 and 300 kw 
must 
pay that rate up to the first 100 kw; above 100 kw, they must 
pay a different rate. 
  [Rodriguez] After 100 kw, the rate should be higher. 
  [Portal] Yes. If you double the price per kilowatt/hour to 
20 
pesos, to give an example, you are stimulating people not to 
consume over 100 kw. You know that today it is forbidden to 
consume over 300 kw. This is included in the plan, even though 
the use of electric stoves and so forth complicates it. But we 
will never authorize a consumption higher than 300 kw, even when 
this is stabilized. We will penalize consumption above 300 kw, 
and you know what the punishment will be: The electricity will 
be shut off for 10 days the first time, then for 30 days. This 
has been done several times. This has created discipline. This 
is a preliminary idea I am giving you, Susana. 
  [Rodriguez] And are you and the ministry studying this 
possibility? 
  [Portal] Yes. Well, other organizations are charged with 
studying how much is collected through this channel. But as we 
have been taught, electricity conservation is very important for 
us, not electricity sales. The problem is not to collect more 
but to prevent people from consuming more. And electricity rates 
cannot be liberated because in that case, a person who obtains 
money through several channels will be free to consume 
electricity. This will not be allowed. The plan must be 
maintained. This is the idea, Susana, and it seems to be 
accepted by most of the people. And if some of the people do not 
agree, well, we will have to raise the price above 100 kw and 
impose a very strong punishment. 
  [Rodriguez] The idea is to stimulate electricity 
conservation. 
  [Portal] That is the idea. 
  [Rodriguez] Osvaldo? 
  [Osvaldo Rodriguez] Minister, I want to return to the 
subject 
that most irritates people: the blackouts. You answered a 
question on why some zones are affected by blackouts while 
others are not, especially those priority zones such as 
hospitals, hotels, tourist centers, water pumping systems, and 
refrigeration plants. But some people think that blackouts are 
more frequent in their zones than in others and imagine that the 
frequency is lower in other provinces. Also, we have received 
calls here in the studio and are still receiving messages from 
our viewers stating that service is often interrupted, 
especially at night. It was mentioned that Revolution Square 
tonight was affected by intermittent blackouts. The lights were 
on and off several times tonight. People also asked why the ball 
games are played at night when we are facing this situation. Why 
aren't the games shifted to the daytime? Perhaps Hector 
Rodriguez will help you answer this question. But, in general, I 
would like you to expand a little more on the outlook for 
improvement of the thermoelectric plants, on the outlook for 
blackouts and whether they save oil, because this is another 
point often asked by the people. Because, as you said, when the 
lights go back on, normally the refrigerators start working, 
everyone turns their equipment on, and consumption rises. 
  [Lee] I would like to add something to this: People have 
also 
asked about the zones not affected by blackouts in 
municipalities with underground power lines. Many television 
viewers have asked about this. Those people fear that the lines 
could develop problems because they are so old; they want to 
know what solutions there may be for the underground lines. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] That is like asking me... 
  [Portal, interrupting] Very well. There are circuits that 
are 
cut off. Not all circuits have the same load, the same number of 
houses, or the same economic objective. That is the fact. 
  The instructions given to our comrades is to try to be as 
fair as possible, that the blackouts be as equal as possible for 
all. If the blackout is for six hours, then it will be six hours 
for all. And if it is for four hours, then four hours for all. 
There may be some guidelines that are not being fulfilled during 
this period, but we are trying to fulfill them as much as 
possible. We are also trying to maintain the best discipline in 
this area. 
  But concerning the fact that we are being unfair with this 
or 
that circuit, and that anyone can reach that conclusion, I have 
my doubts. I find it very difficult. We are controlling this 
continuously, and the control is in effect. We are always trying 
to control everything, especially when there are complaints. And 
people are really zealous about this. Perhaps on some circuits 
the blackouts are a little bit longer, an hour or half-hour 
more, because of the load affecting that circuit. 
  Since consumption and generation are simultaneous, measures 
are adopted to include 50 megawatts more to this or that 
circuit. Then the capital must choose the circuits and 
distribute power gradually. If there is one circuit with a load 
of 25 megawatts, or two circuits with 25 megawatts each, or one 
circuit with 30 and another with 20 megawatts, and there is 
another circuit with 10 megawatts, the circuit with 10 megawatts 
will wait, and the others will be added to a little more, and 
the following day a little more will be given to this and to 
another circuit, until the national power system says: Now you 
can add another load. This happens everyday. That is, the 
additional charge cannot be added instantly. It must be 
established gradually. So this is not and will not be exact. It 
is not possible. 
  And there are people who have been doing this for more than 
three years. This has been approved. The people know that when 
electricity generation was rather stable -- which we hope to 
recover by the end the year -- there was discipline. The 
disconnection hours were well established. This was an 
achievement, and I am certain that this will be restored to the 
extent that the conditions improve. 
  Now, connection or disconnection is usually the consequence 
of the overload on the circuits. This is a fact which I tried to 
explain, especially concerning the most complicated problems 
such as electric stoves, the overload on circuits, etc. I tried 
to explain this because when a transformer is overloaded, there 
is no way to solve it. And the light is turned on and off, on 
and off, and transformers cannot take this for a long time like 
a switch that is just turned on and off. 
  You must have seen also that tree pruning has begun. A tree 
branch can also cause a problem to a circuit or to a 
transformer. But this is not the essential thing we are 
discussing today. The essential thing we are discussing today is 
the overload on circuits that cannot handle a further increase. 
  Ball games do not consume more than what 500 families would 
consume. Ball games are played in a stadium. You know that the 
programming has been changed, adjusted. Most games take place 
during the day, and this is a recreational activity very 
important to our people, for their virtue and [word indistinct]. 
But concerning the playoffs that are played in the stadium... 
  [Hector Rodriguez, interrupting] Yes, there is only one 
national stadium, and the games are played there during the day. 
  [Portal] Then 2.5 million families will have electricity. 
And 
perhaps some 1,500 families will be affected when this occurs. 
Well, I think, Osvaldo, that for the time being, independently 
of the critical situation we are facing, we must try to maintain 
that entertainment which is very important. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] It is the main national entertainment. 
  [Portal] Yes. What was your question, Susana? 
  [Lee] I asked about the underground cables. 
  [Portal] Oh, yes. It is true that the underground network in 
Habana Vieja and part of central Havana is rather old. Part of 
the cables have been replaced, but the problem here is not the 
cables themselves but the system. It was a very modern and 
sophisticated system for that time. It automatically regulates 
the voltage when there is an interruption and reestablishes it 
through a different channel. I think it is too costly for Habana 
Vieja, for the historical part of Havana, to have that type of 
electrical system. And we must take care of it as something 
precious in the capital. What we have to do in that zone, and in 
all priority zones, is to demand, to be very scrupulous on 
electricity conservation. Yesterday, for instance, in order to 
make the distribution, we cut off the circuit; but we turned it 
on again, especially since it creates problems for some 
refrigeration facilities. For this reason this zone is turned 
off only in difficult and unavoidable moments. The system in 
this zone is expected to last several years more, and it will 
because we are taking good care of it. It has not been 
abandoned. But what you said is true, and we must demand a 
maximum savings there, both by the state organizations and by 
the people who live there. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Does that answer your question, Maribel? 
  [Acosta] Yes, thank you. Comrade minister, you have said 
that 
$10 million will be invested this year in maintenance and repair 
of the thermoelectric plants. What does this figure represent in 
relation to the current needs? And also, in our current 
relations with the former Socialist Bloc, to what extent is our 
country or our technology capable of guaranteeing the technology 
which you said has reached 66 percent of the thermoelectric 
plants existing in the country, and are the new investments 
linked to these plants? 
  [Portal] Yes. Well, we have $10 million. And you might ask: 
What is the minimum necessary for the electrical system as a 
whole? Considering the $35 million we used to receive for the 
electrical network, for transformers and all the rest of the 
system, the level was much higher. The needs for the 
thermoelectric plants could be estimated at approximately $20 
million, between $18 and $20 million. But with $10 million we 
will be able to fulfill what has been established, as I have 
explained. This is an important figure. 
  Negotiations are under way with Russian and Czech officials 
to explore the possibility of obtaining some resources for these 
thermoelectric plants. They have listened to our requests with 
great responsibility and gravity and they are studying the 
possibility of participation or economic cooperation. But this 
cooperation will be financed and we must pay for it. I am not 
talking about any other type of assistance. I am talking about 
economic cooperation, about business. We hope this will be 
resolved before the end of the year, and I think it will. But I 
do not want to confirm this categorically or to create false 
expectations. 
  There are many people in these countries who regret what has 
happened to relations with our country; and there is an idea, 
wish, will, to reestablish commercial relations with our country 
on new foundations. And we, of course, would never refuse to do 
this. Our people...[rephrases] I do not think that could have 
[words indistinct]. 
  That is possible (?in Mariel). There is certain 
technological 
equipment, such as a turbine, or a generator...[rephrases] There 
are things that really must be taken care of by the factory that 
planned them. There are very specific things that were done 
there. There is a part of the thermoelectric plant that is 
universal. Let us say that to do this or that [words indistinct] 
you can substitute one piece of equipment by another. That is, 
it is always possible to obtain a part of the equipment in 
another country, if that problem exists. But, well, that 
possibility does exist, and I think it only fair to say so. That 
is to say: It is not an impossibility that our national 
electricity system could receive a certain participation from, 
do business with, this company of the two...[rephrases] of the 
countries that inherited the installations, the workshops, and 
factories that used to produce these (?installations). 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Osvaldo?. 
  [Osvaldo Rodriguez] Yes. Mr. Minister, the nation ended up 
practically paralyzed last year -- its economy, its factories. 
However, at the end of last year and the beginning of this year, 
certain plants began operating, which I suppose has increased 
the demand for electricity. You explained -- I refer once again 
to the chart by which you explained the repairs to, the 
maintenance of the thermoelectric plants -- how capability is to 
be recovered. And I would ask you: Could the electricity system 
compromise the future of our economic recovery, which certain 
specialists see as being imminent? 
  [Portal] I can answer that categorically for you: With these 
measures that have been taken, the national electricity system, 
its generating capacity, is not going to constitute a brake to 
development or to exiting the special period. That is why, 
Osvaldito, it is good to reiterate: When I explained that 86 
percent of the capacity...[rephrases] It is one of the countries 
with the newest electrical installations. I do not know whether 
there is any other 25 years old whose generating capacity is at 
86 percent. It seems to me that very few countries (?can do 
this), and that has been created over these last 30 years of 
Revolution. I mean, that is a fact; understand, Osvaldo? And 
that is very reassuring. 
  The 500 megawatts [words indistinct] plus the 100 equals 600 
additional new ones. I mean: In order to pull out of the special 
period over the next few years, by the end of the century, the 
nation's installed capacity today, by maintaining and repairing 
and everything that we have explained that we have already begun 
to do and to reestablish...[rephrases] There is no doubt: The 
electricity networks are powerful. The country is crossed from 
east to west with 220-volt and 110-volt lines, which must also 
receive maintenance. But powerful substations were established 
on most of the national territory. I reaffirm what I explained a 
while ago. And the generating capacity is recoverable. 
  Later, at some point in the future, we will have to build 
new 
thermoelectric plants, of course, but....[leaves sentence 
unfinished] 
  I also want to tell you that the country 
anticipated...[rephrases] for example, there are the 
five...[rephrases] this one here in eastern Havana, a 
thermoelectric plant which is prepared to be [words indistinct]. 
The one in Matanzas is ready for another to be set up beside it. 
We would no longer have to build a canal to supply and drain sea 
water. All the workshops and all that are already there. Felton 
was planned to accommodate two more units. That is to say that 
we today have -- just as was done in Mariel, which was planned 
to accommodate eight units although it began with two or four or 
so...[rephrases] that, today, is very important: These three 
thermoelectric plants -- Felton, the one in Havana, and the one 
in Matanzas -- are prepared to expand their capacities without 
the necessity for big investments in civil engineering, etc. The 
machines do have to be purchased; that is something we will have 
to take into account in the future, if necessary. It would be 
very quick work to install, to expand capacity, as developments 
might require of us. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Susana? 
  [Lee] Mr. Minister, you were speaking of oil extraction. You 
were talking about the importance of the almost 900,000 tons 
that are used to generate electricity. I think it would be a 
good idea for you to talk to us a little about the prospects 
that exist as regards oil extraction, about the work being done 
in the search for oil, about the new technologies that are being 
applied to increase efficiency in extraction. That is what I 
would like to ask you. 
  [Portal] I do not know whether this might not take me off 
the 
topic a little. I would not be against answering, 
but...[addresses moderator] if you authorize me to do so, 
I....[leaves sentence unfinished] 
  [Hector Rodriguez] We have time. 
  [Portal] Will anything be left on the other topic? Can we 
get 
into that? 
  [Hector Rodriguez] The matter of generating electricity has 
been exhausted. 
  [Acosta] Hector, fundamental concerns that we have heard 
from 
the population. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] I do not know whether the minister has 
anything else. 
  [Portal] I have tried to explain without exhortation, with 
the greatest possible objectivity, right? I would like perhaps 
to comment that the electricity sector workers -- the sector 
chiefs, technicians, [words indistinct] in general -- bear an 
extraordinary responsibility on their shoulders. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Of course. 
  [Portal] They have the foundation, which is what has 
provided, I think, the authority, the respect for what we have 
had to do over these past three or four years -- an authority 
won by being one of the branches that for 25 years, 
uninterruptedly, grew from year to year, without failing to grow 
for a single year. And with diminishing fuel consumption from 
year to year. Efficiency increased from 400 grams in 1959 to 
270, through investments and so forth. That is not the work of 
the electricity sector workers alone. I mean, construction 
workers, the nation, the government, the Revolution all worked 
on it. But that foundation was exploited, and at a level 
comparable to that of the Western countries. That is important. 
The nation's 95-percent electrification is something 
spectacular. We know about other countries, in Asia, for 
example...[changes thought] Vietnam itself, with whose 
authorities we have spoken, is 35-percent electrified. In Latin 
America, there are other countries...[rephrases] (?low) 
countries. China itself is not electrified to the extent that we 
are. They may be at 75 or 80 percent. They have areas with many 
problems still, rural areas. The country is very large. It is 
very difficult. We, ourselves, have 95-percent electrification. 
  I say this now, at the end, to give confidence that we (?are 
going to solve) this problem. I mean, this is not a problem that 
will be delegated to improvised people, people who...[rephrases] 
No, we are really working, soberly, and there will be a response 
by the electricity industry, by our workers, by everyone. I 
think that the support from the Ministry of Construction, the 
comrades from the (?SIME) [Steelworking Industry], and the 
comrades from other forces that are going to join in, as the 
resources become available to us, is also important. This gives 
us great confidence, really, that the country will be able to 
recover from this situation we are in. 
  The other subject is one that is very... 
  [Hector Rodriguez, interrupting] Mr. Minister, excuse me: 
Before you go into (?that), a viewer has just called in and is 
asking -- he seems not to be fully satisfied, even with all the 
explaining -- whether the Cienfuegos CEN, the Cienfuegos Nuclear 
Power Plant, will be finished, and whether this would solve the 
country's electrical power problem. 
  [Portal] All right, then let us finish with the CEN. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Then petroleum would be the last thing, 
right? 
  [Portal] Yes. Well, we halted the CEN. We halted it. The 
commander in chief himself, as you know, met with the workers 
there and explained the decision, one of the most painful we 
have had to make. The Russian and Cuban Governments have 
confirmed their will to do everything they possibly can to 
finish the CEN -- the first and second reactors -- their will, 
desire, and interest. Both governments need a third partner to 
participate in the Juragua CEN. The three countries would have 
to share that investment, and then, logically, sell for hard 
currency the energy generated at the Juragua CEN. And we would 
have to pay those countries for it, for our country -- for the 
portion that would correspond to it. 
  The country does not today have the financial means to 
continue building the Juragua nuclear power plant, and we would 
have to effect a business deal of that nature. 
  The work has been preserved. The civil engineering work for 
the first reactor is finished. It is fabulous. There you have 
the reactor, and part of the equipment, preserved. Over the past 
two years, the country has been inspected by the International 
Atomic Energy Agency [IAEA], rigorous inspections that have 
helped counter propaganda campaigns abroad regarding CEN 
technology and so forth. We have received the IAEA technicians; 
their recommendations were that the CEN is being perfectly 
preserved and that a business deal can go forward with it, that 
the nuclear power plant can be continued. 
  If that inspection had not been positive, had there been any 
doubt, I would not be talking about this. So, I mean, those are 
the conditions today. The Russians, the Cuban and Russian 
Government and the energy authorities of the two countries, are 
today analyzing things and negotiating with a number of 
international firms that have expressed an interest in the 
matter. 
  That is very interesting. It is a complex business, as you 
can well imagine. Difficult, but it would really allow us to 
finish, if it is feasible and could happen. 
  These are very complex negotiations. Those are our 
prospects, 
as regards the CEN. We do not have, right now, the financial 
means to continue the work ourselves, alone. That is clear, and 
that is why the work was halted. And, very responsibly, both the 
comrade construction workers -- who remain there -- and our 
comrades who are prepared for exploitation, are there. And the 
CEN could be two years away from being finished. 
  If it were to be set up and finished, it would mean 400 
megawatts of nuclear-generated power. That is what I can tell 
you regarding that matter. 
  [Acosta] Does the third partner already exist, Mr. Minister? 
  [Portal] No, and maybe if it did, I would not be able to 
tell 
you so, at this moment. [all chuckle] So let's go on to the oil: 
In the case of the oil... 
  [Hector Rodriguez, interrupting] You would not be able to 
tell us because they [not further identified] are so alert to 
every bit of business that Cuba does, to every single thing it 
might buy, so as to block it immediately, apply pressure 
immediately. Would that be the reason? Obviously. 
  [Portal] But as regards the technology of our nuclear power 
plant and all that, even serious U.S. authorities already 
acknowledge that the technology of our CEN is safe, that the CEN 
can be finished, that there is no problem. We have information 
from very important U.S. Government authorities that have 
acknowledged that there is no difficulty. That smooths out the 
way for other partners to be able to...[rephrases] finish the 
CEN. So, let's go on to the oil. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Yes, that (?question) of Susana's is 
still 
floating around. 
  [Portal] The oil: Here, maybe we can share certain things 
that could be encouraging to our population. As is known, we 
divided the island up into blocs -- both land and sea, some 26 
blocs -- for exploring for oil, and we have negotiated 
investments by several companies in oil exploration. To a 
certain extent, this is related to the energy thing, the 
nation's situation and all. 
  Why do I say this? Because this kind of business deal is one 
of the most difficult, because the foreign companies have to run 
the risk -- investing, during a first stage, tens of millions of 
dollars and, in a second stage, hundreds of millions of dollars! 
That is: You have to put money into it. And in one way or 
another, over $50 million have already been invested by these 
companies in the Cuban oil business. All together, it is already 
nearing $100 million in seeking, exploring for, oil. 
  These companies invest, and if oil is found they recover 
their investment -- through a part of that oil, depending on how 
much oil there is and what quality is obtained. If it is a big 
deposit, and the oil is good quality, it can be as much as 90 
percent for the Cuban side and 10 percent for the foreign 
company. During the period of recovery of the investment, it is 
to be 50-50. Once the investment is recovered, in the first few 
years, once those are past, it depends on the volume and quality 
of oil found. 
  Well, of the seven most developed countries in the world -- 
and I can mention the United States, Japan, the FRG [as heard], 
etc. -- three are investing in petroleum exploration in Cuba. 
They are France -- several companies -- Canada, and Great 
Britain. 
  I do not think I am telling any secret in saying that Great 
Britain is the main U.S. ally, a country which in its 
parliamentary organizations has publicly studied its relations 
with Cuba. It did so in the House of Lords. And it is 
interesting to see how some British political figures and 
businessmen analyze the U.S. policy on Cuba, and how they 
realize that Americans have a double objective with us: a 
political objective, which obviously seeks to destroy the 
Revolution by all means; and an economic objective, which is to 
prevent other countries from investing in our country. When the 
United States decides to lift the blockade, let us say in 20 or 
100 years [changes thought] or perhaps, if an important oil 
deposit is found, the blockade will no longer have any effect. I 
hope this will happen. 
  But it is quite interesting to see how these political 
figures analyzed this situation and reached the conclusion that 
it is important to favor the trade of the former British 
colonies which have natural, historical, and economic relations 
with us. They have realized that our touristic development must 
be related to the touristic development of many of those islands 
that live on tourism, and that this is the moment to begin. They 
have taken the first step. One of their companies has already 
signed a petroleum research contract. That is, there are three 
[as heard] countries: France, Canada, Great Britain, and also 
Sweden. 
  I am not talking about the U.S. Government, but about its 
oil 
companies, the U.S. businessmen from the petroleum sector, and 
other organizations such as the mining, iron and steel, and 
tourism industry areas who have expressed concern about and are 
fully aware of our situation, hoping to be authorized to invest 
here. They have attended the meetings we held in Canada and in 
Great Britain -- that is, in London and in Calgary -- where our 
comrades submitted proposals. And the great U.S. companies were 
there; they obtained all the information they needed and they 
are up-to-date concerning this situation. That is, they are 
willing to come here, but they also have other interests; but we 
can see and feel that there is great interest in this area. 
  There is a search for oil today everywhere in Cuba, in 
different stages. In some parts we are using the seismic 
exploration system, which is a mandatory step. This is because 
the seismic system determines the soil structure, the age of the 
earth, the geology, and the characteristics of the place which 
are best for drilling. If these structures are not revealed, 
then no drilling takes place. That is the first step. It is a 
guiding step, but millions of dollars must be invested in that 
first step. If it takes place offshore, a special vessel will be 
necessary. But if it is carried out on land, well, equipment of 
highly developed technology is in use in the country. 
  Both on land and offshore, this highly sophisticated 
equipment will supplement the information -- and it is fair to 
say this -- the information we have developed with the former 
Soviet Union for many years. The country has been well studied. 
The country has seismic information; it has information on the 
geology of solid minerals and of petroleum and for this reason 
this study has been very useful, and for this reason we have 
made quick progress. And today we have signed contracts for 
exploration of the most promising areas in the country. 
  Then, at the conclusion of the seismic exploration step in 
some areas, it has been determined that there are seismic 
structures which are similar to the seismic structures of other 
countries and which offer good drilling prospects. Drilling has 
begun. Well, the drilling has begun offshore, and drilling by 
these companies will also begin on land within the next few days 
or next week. If the prospects were not good, we would 
not....[leaves sentence unfinished] Now, if this study shows 
that those sedimentary rocks are from the same time period as 
those in other countries where oil was found, and whether they 
contain petroleum or not, a decision will be made. But Cuba has 
oil; we hope to extract 1.2 million tons this year, and there 
are good prospects to increase this production. 
  Well, this is as much as I can tell you. We have taken the 
seismic step, and the drillings have begun in those places, and 
our hopes are not just abstract. Our hopes are real, and the 
prospects are also real. 
  I also want to add that if oil is found, or let us suppose 
that when an oil deposit is found, we must then determine how 
much petroleum is in that deposit; depending on the structure, 
three or four wells more must be drilled to determine the volume 
of the petroleum existing in that place. The exploitation comes 
later and can take two or three years, depending on the deposit 
and its characteristics. But I think it would be foolish to try 
to conceal any information from the people on this problem. I 
think it would be very encouraging for the people to receive any 
information of this type, and we are never going to conceal such 
information. I thought, therefore, that it was important to 
explain this. 
  These companies have other tasks which will also give us an 
idea of how promising the petroleum business is in Cuba. The 
fact is that using the old Soviet techniques, or the old Soviet 
wells, we have contracted foreign companies to exploit these 
wells. For instance, a foreign company chooses a well that was 
producing 30 tons, 20 tons, 15, or 10 tons, and, using more 
modern technology, increases the production of that well. Some 
have increased two, three, or four times more. Some have reached 
production of 60, 70, or 80 tons. And they started with 20 tons. 
Then this increase in oil, which Cuba was never going to have, 
was divided and shared with that company. That is, the basic 
production is not negotiated. That is ours. But if production is 
increased by using modern technology...[changes thought] and we 
have been doing this over the past few years. That is, the 
petroleum activity has this potential and we can enjoy it. 
  I did not want to discuss this from the political point of 
view; but, well, this is just a feeling I have, and I have to 
say it because this is what most Cubans are feeling. In this 
period, every time we sign a contract of this sort, whether on 
oil, nickel, mining in general, or in the quest of precious 
minerals, or in tourism, etc., with non-U.S. companies, we feel 
a satisfaction, and more than a satisfaction because we have no 
prejudice but an assurance that in the future we must not do 
this type of business with U.S. companies alone. This would 
imply compromising our economic independence for the third time 
with that powerful country. And this does not seem to be what we 
Cubans want. We could not avoid it if the blockade were lifted. 
But only in part, because we are not rejecting any offer. If the 
American people want to enjoy our beaches, etc., we are not 
going to say: Do not build hotels here; don't do this or that. 
It would be foolish on our part to refuse these things. 
  But it is good that we build our own hotels, or build them 
with the Spaniards, with the Italians or the Canadians, or with 
any country in the world. Well, the Americans are delaying this. 
But in the future, if the blockade is lifted, part of the U.S. 
tourists will have to go to those hotels. We realize -- and it 
is something I was trying to convey -- we feel as if we were 
winning a war of independence each time we do business with 
non-American capital. This is what I was trying to say. 
  But we cannot deny the fact that the United States, that 
powerful country, that market about which no one has any doubt 
because it is a high-level market with highly developed 
technology, can be attractive to us as well. This feeling is 
also shared by the other companies that come here today. 
  I want to add that we Cubans are loyal. We are loyal. The 
Cuban loyalty has been proven. We are loyal even to our African 
forefathers. And serious capitalists, representatives of the 
upstanding companies, also feel that when we do business with 
one of these companies, we are never going to betray them, not 
even when the United States decides to lift the blockade. 
Neither are we going to renegotiate the business or deals we 
have signed. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] We are serious and loyal. 
  [Portal] And this is the rationale of the electricity issue 
to which they refer so much. You have to see what is being 
published abroad, how the news is distorted and the treatment 
they give to this issue. They say: The country's electricity 
generating capacity has fallen apart; do not invest in this area 
anymore. Here is the truth about what they are saying. 
  For this reason, our reporters must try to be as objective 
as 
possible because it is obvious that they are trying to thwart, 
to discourage people. But prestigious people are arriving here 
continuously. And as soon as they arrive at the airport, they 
realize the problems we are facing, especially the blackouts, 
the transport and food problems, etc. Well, people immediately 
refer to our preparation and the possibilities of doing business 
here. They refer to our loyalty and honesty in our deals. No one 
has to offer $1 million to a minister, or $2 million to 
negotiate this or that. There is no corruption in government 
circles. Many serious people are coming here, and not just 
because they like to be here. 
  Not in vain are we in the 19th place in the world among 
countries where investments can be made with greater security. 
How many are behind us; but I do not want to mention names. I 
believe the press has already published this, but they can 
publish it again at any time; they can do it today, because this 
is something very important. 
  We are one of the most promising countries for investments. 
This also confirms our people's decision to fight and to 
overcome all our problems. They do not want to be caught in a 
situation of hunger, proceeding from here to there. No. our 
people do not want this. They are taking this calmly and with 
intelligence. 
  You can see that the situation stemming from the 
electricity problem is very difficult. But we are facing it and 
trying to overcome it. People know that this is not going to 
last forever, and that we are not going to die without having 
had a chance to fight and win. 
  We are also accused of not making changes, of not doing this 
or that, when changes were made only a few months ago. This is 
perceived by the capitalists who come here. We have made 
tremendous changes in the economy. A few years ago we would not 
even think of making these changes. We have made changes in 
agriculture, changes related to the presence of foreign capital, 
and to the decriminalization of the dollar. These changes hurt 
because they are often unfair, but we have made them 
courageously. We can also mention the self-employment jobs, 
communications with the world abroad, relations with the 
community of emigres, et cetera. These are crucial decisions, 
and we must consider that there are still millions of decisions 
to be made, decisions that are being studied. 
  But the decisions that were made are serious decisions, 
decisions that are very important for the country. These 
decisions are not reversible, and the peasants and agricultural 
workers know this. They know that over the past few months, the 
state administration has been replaced by cooperatives. They 
know that there are guarantees, that they have security, and 
that they can work the land as much as possible because the 
fruits they produce will not be taken away from them. These are 
important steps, because the most common criticisms we hear are 
that no measures have been adopted, that the country is idle, 
that no one works. This is inadmissible. For this reason I was 
saying that it is important to explain. I think it is my duty to 
explain this, to share this with the people. But we cannot often 
share this. Excuse me if I am taking too much of your time, 
Hector. 
  [Rodriguez] No, on the contrary. We thank you, minister. I 
only want, if you wish, minister, to read a question posed by a 
listener from Havana. It says: How much has the demand increased 
this year at peak-consumption hours as a result of the use of 
electric stoves? 
  [Portal] I mentioned this when I mentioned the 350 megawatts 
at peak hour, but I failed to give the percentage. The demand is 
increasing 24 percent. This is a high percentage, and we cannot 
cope with it. 
  [Osvaldo Rodriguez] Minister, now that you are returning to 
this subject of the electric stoves at the very end of your 
participation in this program, allow me to ask you something 
that also worries the people. The liquefied gas and the 
kerosene: When will their distribution be reestablished? 
  [Portal] Tremendous resources must be used to achieve this, 
and I cannot give you an exact date. This is not possible to 
predict. I could say May or June, but there is a timetable to 
repair the Nico Lopez refinery plant. In May, we are going to 
import a good amount of gas, which is produced by the [word 
indistinct]. But it is impossible to tell you that we are going 
to solve this problem in a short time. I am only ratifying what 
I said because this is one of the most difficult, complex issues 
we must solve within the next few months. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] The electric stove issue seems to be 
crucial. 
  [Portal] Yes. 
  [Acosta] Minister, concerning the petroleum prospects you 
mentioned, is there a possibility of finding light petroleum in 
the country? 
  [Portal] That is what we are looking for. [laughs] 
  [Hector Rodriguez] It must show up somewhere. 
  [Portal] But if heavy petroleum is found, it will be 
welcomed. I think I will be forced to explain that we would use 
it again. Not to talk about cement, but if it can be used in 
producing cement, it will be of help. 
  [Hector Rodriguez] Well, the minister has been with us for 
almost two hours. I think his explanations were very clear and 
broad. I want to thank the minister for his presence here. I 
think this is the first time he has participated in this 
program. I have been after him for a long time, and he has been 
saying that he would be glad to join us to talk about this 
crucial electricity generation issue in the country. 
  I want to thank him for being here with us and for all the 
information he has given to the country. I think all the 
information was correct and on the mark. I believe he was 
consistent with everything. 
  I also wish to thank the reporters who participated in this 
program, and who have made the presence of Basic Industry 
Minister Marcos Portal on this program possible. Thank you, 
Minister, and although this was your first participation, I hope 
it will not be the last. 
  [Portal] Thank you. 

